District of Columbia statutes.
44-103.03

Special ALR licensure for community residence facilities.

Expired.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 303, 47 DCR 2647

Editor's Notes

Pursuant to subsec. (c) of this section, this section expired 3 years after June 24, 2000.